Utah statutes.
26-20-8.   Knowledge of past acts not necessary to establish fact that false statement or representation knowingly made.

In prosecution under this chapter, it is not necessary to show that the person had knowledge of similar acts having been performed in the past on the part of persons acting on his behalf nor to show that the person had actual notice that the acts by the persons acting on his behalf occurred to establish the fact that a false statement or representation was knowingly made.

